Utah statutes.
17-27a-307.   Certain township planning and zoning board dissolved.

Except as provided in Subsection 17-27a-306(1)(f), the planning and zoning board of each township formed before May 5, 1997, under Laws of Utah 1996, Chapter 308, is dissolved.

